testing/sms-tests.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: sms/bin/sms-gen.hfstol
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: sms/bin/isms.fst
    Morph: sms/bin/sms.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mõõnnâd: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm
     mõõnnâd+V+Inf: mõõnnâd
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mõõnam
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mõõnak
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mâânn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [mõõnnâp, mõõ´nnâp]
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mõõnnve´ted
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mâ´nne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: mõõnât
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mõ´nnem
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mõ´nniǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mõõni
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mõõnim
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mõõnid
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mõ´nne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: mõ´nneš
     mõõnnâd+V+PrfPrc: mõõnnâm

  Verb - vue´lǧǧed: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Inf: vue´lǧǧed
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuâlǥam
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuâlǥak
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vue´lǧǧep
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vue´lǧǧve´ted
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vuâ´lǧǧe, vue´lǧǧe]
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+4: vue´ljet
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vue´lj
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuõ´lǧǧem
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuõ´lǧǧiǩ
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuõ´lji
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuõ´ljim
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuõ´ljid
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuõ´lǧǧe
     vue´lǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+4: vue´lješ
     vue´lǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vue´lǧǧâm


  Verb - viikkâd: # Verb 'to run' - full paradigm
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥam
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥak
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekk
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viikkve´ted
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ve´ǩǩe 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: viiǥǥat
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vi´ǩǩem 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vi´ǩǩiǩ 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viiǥǥi
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [viiǥǥim, viiǥǥin]
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viiǥǥid
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vi´ǩǩe
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: vi´ǩǩeš
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥžem
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥžiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viiǥǥaž
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [viiǥǥžep, viiǥǥžim, viiǥǥžin]
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viiǥǥžid 
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: viiǥǥže
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Prs+4: vue´ljžet
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥčem
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥčiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: viiǥǥči
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [viiǥǥčim, viiǥǥčin, viiǥǥčep]
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: viiǥǥčid
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: viiǥǥče
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Prs+4: viiǥǥčeš
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥ
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: veeǥǥas
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: viikkâd
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: vekkaz
     viikkâd+V+AktEss:    viikkmen
     viikkâd+V+Akt:    viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+PrsPcp:    viikki
     viikkâd+V+PrfPrc: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+Pss+PrfPrc: vikkum
     viikkâd+V+VAbess: [viiǥǥkani, viiǥǥǩeännai]
     viikkâd+V+Ger: viiǥǥeen
     viikkâd+V+Ger: viiǥǥee´l
     viikkâd+V+Neg.Conv: vikku
     
  Verb - poorrâd: # Verb 'to eat' - full paradigm
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pooram
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: poorak
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: påårr
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: poorrve´ted
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: på´rre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: poorât
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: po´rrem
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: po´rriǩ
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poori
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [poorim, poorin]
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poorid
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: po´rre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: po´rreš
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pooržem
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: pooržiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: poorež
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [pooržep, pooržim]
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: pooržid
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: poorže
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Prs+4: pooržet
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: poorčem
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: poorčiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: poorči
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [poorčim, poorčep]
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: poorčid
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: poorče
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Prs+4: poorčeš
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: poor
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: pååras
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: poorrâd
     poorrâd+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: pårraz
     poorrâd+V+AktEss: poorrmen
     poorrâd+V+Akt: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+PrsPcp: poorri
     poorrâd+V+PrfPrc: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+Pss+PrfPrc: porrum
     poorrâd+V+VAbes: poorkani
   
  Verb - läullad: # Verb 'to sing' - full paradigm
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lääulam 
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lääulak
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: läull
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: läullap
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: läullve´ted
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läulla
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+4: lääulat
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laullum
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laulluk
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lääulai
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lääulaim, lääulain]
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lääulaid
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laullu
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+4: laulluš
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: lääulžem
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: lääulžiǩ
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: lääulež
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [lääulžep, lääulžim]
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: lääulžid 
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: lääulže
     läullad+V+Pot+Prs+4: lääulžet
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: lääulčem
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: lääulčiǩ
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: lääulči
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [lääulčim, lääulčep]
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: lääulčid
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: lääulče
     läullad+V+Cond+Prs+4: lääulčeš
     läullad+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: lääul
     läullad+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: lääulas
     läullad+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: läullâp
     läullad+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: läullad
     läullad+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: läullaz
     läullad+V+AktEss: läullmen
     läullad+V+Akt: läullam
     läullad+V+Prs.Pcp: läullai
     läullad+V+PrfPrc: läullam
     läullad+V+Pss+PrfPrc: laullum
           
  Verb - ju´rdded: # Verb 'to think, to consider' - full paradigm
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joordam
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: joordak
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jordd
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ju´rddep
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ju´rddve´ted
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jo´rdde
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prs+4: juu´rdet
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ju´rddem
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ju´rddiǩ
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juu´rdi
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [juu´rdim, juu´rdin]
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juu´rdid
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ju´rdde
     ju´rdded+V+Ind+Prt+4: ju´rddeš 
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: juu´rdžem
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: juu´rdžiǩ
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: juu´rdež
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: juu´rdčim
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: [juu´rdžep, juu´rdžim]
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: juu´rdže
     ju´rdded+V+Pot+Prs+4: juu´rdžet
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: joordčem
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: joordčiǩ
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: joordči
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [joordčim, juurdčep]
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: joordčid
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: joordče
     ju´rdded+V+Cond+Prs+4: joordčeš
     ju´rdded+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: juu´rd
     ju´rdded+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: joordas
     ju´rdded+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: ju´rddep
     ju´rdded+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: ju´rdded
     ju´rdded+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: jorddaz
     

  Verb - ää´veed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ää´vääm
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ää´vääk
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ää´vad
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ää´veep
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ää´vve´ted
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ää´vee 
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prs+4: ää´veet
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ää´veem
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ää´viiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ää´vii
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ää´viim, ää´viin]
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ää´viid
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ää´vee
     ää´veed+V+Ind+Prt+4: ää´veeš
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ää´ve´žem
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ää´ve´žiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: ää´veež
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [ää´ve´žep, ää´ve´žim]
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ää´ve´žid 
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ää´ve´že
     ää´veed+V+Pot+Prs+4: ää´ve´žet
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ää´ve´čem
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ää´ve´čiǩ
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ää´ve´či
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [ää´ve´čim, ää´ve´čep]
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ää´ve´čid
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ää´ve´če
     ää´veed+V+Cond+Prs+4: ää´ve´češ
     ää´veed+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg2: ää´ved
     ää´veed+V+Imprt+Prs+Sg3: ää´vââǥǥas
     ää´veed+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl1: ää´vâkap
     ää´veed+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl2: ää´ve´ǩed
     ää´veed+V+Imprt+Prs+Pl3: ää´vâkaz
     ää´veed+V+AktEss: ää´ve´men
     ää´veed+V+Akt: ää´veem
     ää´veed+V+PrsPrc: ää´veei
     ää´veed+V+PrfPrc: ää´vääm
     ää´veed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [ää´vummu, ää´vuum]
     ää´veed+V+VAbess: ää´veǩâni
     ää´veed+NegConv2: ää´vukku
